Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.690 is amended to read:
458.690. (1) A fiduciary  organization selected under ORS 458.695 may qualify as the recipient
of account contributions that qualify the contributor for a tax credit under ORS 315.271 only if the
fiduciary organization matches  amounts deposited by the account holder according to a formula es-
tablished by the fiduciary organization of not less than $1 nor more than $5 for each $1  deposited
by the account  holder. The matching funds must be deposited into a designated account that is
controlled  by  the fiduciary organization and is separate from the savings account of the account
holder.
(2) [ Account holders may not accrue more than $6,000 of  matching funds under subsection (1) of
this section from state-directed moneys in any 12-month period. A fiduciary organization  may designate
a lower amount as a limit on annual matching funds. ] A  fiduciary organization shall maintain on
deposit sufficient funds  to cover the matching deposit agreements for all individual development
accounts managed by the organization.
[(3) The Housing and Community Services Department shall adopt  rules to establish a maximum
total amount  of state-directed moneys that may be deposited as matching funds into an individual de-
velopment account. ]
(3) The maximum total amount of state-directed moneys that may  be accrued as
matching funds in an individual development account is $20,000.
(4) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall provide information to the Depart-
ment of Revenue about all individual development account contributors that  are qualified for a tax
credit under ORS 315.271, if required by ORS 315.058.
Enrolled Senate Bill 465 (SB 465-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 465 (SB 465-A) Page 2